Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0182.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 part 1 line-item appropriations Sec. 101. There is appropriated for various state departments and agencies to supplement appropriations for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, from the following funds: APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated classified positions 0.0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 71,000,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 71,000,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 71,000,000 Sec. 102. DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND RURAL DEVELOPMENT (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated classified positions 0.0 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,000,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,000,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 1,000,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (2) ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Fair food network ? double up food bucks $ 1,000,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,000,000 Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ 1,000,000 Sec. 103. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated classified positions 0.0 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 70,000,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 70,000,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 70,000,000 (2) ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Emergency assistance fund $ 50,000,000 Emergency food bank grants 10,000,000 Michigan agricultural surplus system 10,000,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 70,000,000 Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ 70,000,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 part 2 provisions concerning appropriations general sections Sec. 201. Pursuant to section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, total state spending from state sources under part 1 for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026 is $71,000,000.00 and total state spending from state sources to be paid to local units of government is $0.00. Sec. 202. The appropriations made and expenditures authorized under this part and part 1 and the departments, commissions, boards, offices, and programs for which appropriations are made under this part and part 1 are subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES Sec. 301. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for emergency assistance fund, the department of health and human services shall allocate $50,000,000.00 to raise the food-purchasing power of low-income individuals and households. The department shall prioritize payments to individuals and households experiencing the greatest level of need. Funds allocated under this subsection are available for expenditure only if expenditure authority for federal funding of food assistance program benefits appropriated in section 107 of article 6 of 2025 PA 22 expires or is no longer available. The department may use funding to provide for the purchase of any food or beverage product intended for human consumption except alcoholic beverages, tobacco, and hot foods or foods ready for immediate consumption. The department may utilize existing agreements with electronic benefit transfer vendors to administer the electronic 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 transfer of the funds of this state to low-income individuals or households. The department shall ensure that no federal funds are expended or transferred under the funding appropriated in this section. Sec. 302. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for Michigan agricultural surplus system, the department of health and human services shall allocate $10,000,000.00 for procuring and distributing the Michigan agricultural surplus system to distribute surplus produce to low-income residents of this state. Sec. 303. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for emergency food bank grants, the department of health and human services shall allocate funds to members of the Food Bank Council of Michigan. These funds may support, but are not limited to, the following activities: (a) Nutrition assistance. (b) Food bank resources. (2) Expenditures made under this section must be made in a geographically diverse manner.